District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-832.06

Execution, acknowledgment and recordation of a lien instrument in the same manner as a deed.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 206, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(a), 49 DCR 2551

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).

Emergency Legislation

Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of chapter, see § 403(a) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).